Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.040

Activation of inactive county noxious weed control board.

An inactive county noxious weed control board may be activated by any one of the following methods:

(1) Either within sixty days after a petition is filed by one hundred registered voters within the county or, on its own motion, the county legislative authority shall hold a hearing to determine whether there is a need, due to a damaging infestation of noxious weeds, to activate the county noxious weed control board. If such a need is found to exist, then the county legislative authority shall, in the manner provided by RCW 17.10.050, appoint five persons to the county's noxious weed control board.

(2) If the county's noxious weed control board is not activated within one year following a hearing by the county legislative authority to determine the need for activation, then upon the filing with the state noxious weed control board of a petition comprised either of the signatures of at least two hundred registered voters within the county, or of the signatures of a majority of an adjacent county's noxious weed control board, the state board shall, within six months of the date of the filing, hold a hearing in the county to determine the need for activation. If a need for activation is found to exist, then the state board shall order the county legislative authority to activate the county's noxious weed control board and to appoint members to the board in the manner provided by RCW 17.10.050.

(3) The director, upon request of the state noxious weed control board, shall order a county legislative authority to activate the noxious weed control board immediately if an infestation of a class A noxious weed or class B noxious weed designated for control on the state noxious weed list is confirmed in that county. The county legislative authority may, as an alternative to activating the noxious weed board, combat the class A noxious weed or class B noxious weed with county resources and personnel operating with the authorities and responsibilities imposed by this chapter on a county noxious weed control board. No county may continue without a noxious weed control board for a second consecutive year if the class A noxious weed or class B noxious weed has not been eradicated.

[ 1997 c 353 s 5; 1987 c 438 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 4.]